hunspell/hy_AM.aff
FLAG long
# ալ - ել  verb class specific
SFX	VB	Y 	117
SFX	VB	ել	ող/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացող/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	ել	ողներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացողներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	ել	ած/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	ել	ածներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացած/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացածներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	ել	ուող/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	լ	ցուող/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	ել	ուողներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	լ	ցուողներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	ել	ուած/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	ել	ուածներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	լ	ցուած/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	լ	ցուածներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	լ	ցնող/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	լ	ցնողներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	լ	ցրած/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	լ	ցրածներ/CHDEABGEINLO .	
SFX	VB	ալ	ացել .
SFX	VB	ել	եցուել/CHG2A2INLODE .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուել/CHG2A2INLODE .	
SFX	VB	ել	եցրել .	
SFX	VB	ալ	ացրել .
SFX	VB	ել	իր .	
SFX	VB	ալ	ա .
SFX	VB	ել	եցէք .	
SFX	VB	ալ	ացէք .
SFX	VB	ել	ուիր .	
SFX	VB	լ	ցուիր .
SFX	VB	ել	ուեցէք .	
SFX	VB	ալ	ացուեցէք .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացրէք .
SFX	VB	ել	եցրու .	
SFX	VB	ալ	ացրու .
SFX	VB	ել	եցրէք .	
SFX	VB	ալ	ացրեցէք .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացրէք .
SFX	VB	լ	ցնել/CHG2A2INLODE	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցներ	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնեմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնես/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնի/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնենք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնէք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնեն/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնէի/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնէիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնէր/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնէինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնէիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնէին/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցրեցի/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցրեցիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցրեց/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցրեցինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցրեցիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցրեցին/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցրի/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցրիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցրինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցրիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցրին/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնելիս	.
SFX	VB	ել	ուելիս	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցուելիս	.
SFX	VB	լ	լիս	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցւում	.
SFX	VB	ել	ւում	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնում	.
SFX	VB	լ	ր	.
SFX	VB	ել	ուել/CHG2A2INLODE	.
SFX	VB	ել	ուեմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	ուես/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	ուի/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	ուենք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	ուէք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	ուեն/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցուեր .
SFX	VB	լ	ցուել/CHG2A2INLODE	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցուեմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցուես/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցուի/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցուենք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցուէք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցուեն/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	ուէի/CHG2A2INLODE	.
SFX	VB	ել	ուէիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	ուէր/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	ուէինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	ուէիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	ուէին/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցուէի/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցուէիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցուէր/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցուէինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցուէիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցուէին/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցի/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցիր/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ց/CH .
SFX	VB	լ	ցինք/CH .
SFX	VB	լ	ցիք/CH .
SFX	VB	լ	ցին/CH .
SFX	VB	ել	ուեցի/CH	.
SFX	VB	ել	ուեցիր/CH	.
SFX	VB	ել	ուեց/CH .
SFX	VB	ել	ուեցինք/CH .
SFX	VB	ել	ուեցիք/CH .
SFX	VB	ել	ուեցին/CH .
SFX	VB	լ	ցուեցի/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցուեցիր/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցուեց/CH .
SFX	VB	լ	ցուեցինք/CH .
SFX	VB	լ	ցուեցիք/CH .
SFX	VB	լ	ցուեցին/CH .


#nal ուշացայ մօտեցայ
SFX	VC	Y	86
SFX	VC	նալ	ցայ/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցար/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցաւ/CH .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցանք/CH .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցաք/CH .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցան/CH .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուել/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուեմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուես/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուի/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուենք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուէք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուեն/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցող/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցողներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցած/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցածներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուող/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուողներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուած/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուածներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնող/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնողներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրած/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրածներ/CHDEABGEINLO .	
SFX	VC	նալ	ցել .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուել/CHG2A2INLODE .	
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրել .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցիր .	
SFX	VC	նալ	նա .	
SFX	VC	նալ	նար .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցէք .	
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուիր .	
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուեցէք .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրէք .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրու .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրեցէք .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնել/CHG2A2INLODE	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցներ	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնեմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնես/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնի/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնենք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնէք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնեն/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնէի/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնէիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնէր/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնէինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնէիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնէին/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրեցի/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրեցիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրեց/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրեցինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրեցիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրեցին/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրի/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրին/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնելիս	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուելիս	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցւում	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնում	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուեր .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուել/CHG2A2INLODE	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուեմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուես/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուի/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուենք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուէք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուեն/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուէի/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուէիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուէր/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուէինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուէիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուէին/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուեցի/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուեցիր/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուեց/CH .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուեցինք/CH .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուեցիք/CH .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցուեցին/CH .


#nel qel
SFX	VD	Y	165
SFX	VD	նել	այ/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ար/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	աւ/CH .
SFX	VD	նել	անք/CH .
SFX	VD	նել	աք/CH .
SFX	VD	նել	ան/CH .
SFX	VD	նել	ած/CHABGEINLODEPP .
SFX	VD	նել	ածներ/CHABGEINLODE .
SFX	VD	չել	այ/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ար/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	աւ/CH .
SFX	VD	չել	անք/CH .
SFX	VD	չել	աք/CH .
SFX	VD	չել	ան/CH .
SFX	VD	չել	ած/CHABGEINLODEPP .
SFX	VD	չել	ածներ/CHABGEINLODE .
SFX	VD	ել	ող/CHABGEINLODEPP .
SFX	VD	ել	ողներ/CHABGEINLODE .
SFX	VD	նել	ցուող/CHABGEINLODEPP .	
SFX	VD	նել	ցուողներ/CHABGEINLODE .
SFX	VD	չել	ցուող/CHABGEINLODEPP .	
SFX	VD	չել	ցուողներ/CHABGEINLODE .
SFX	VD	չել	ցուած/CHABGEINLODEPP .
SFX	VD	չել	ցուածներ/CHABGEINLODE .
SFX	VD	նել	ցուած/CHABGEINLODEPP .
SFX	VD	նել	ցուածներ/CHABGEINLODE .
SFX	VD	չել	ցրած/CHABGEINLODEPP .
SFX	VD	չել	ցրածներ/CHABGEINLODE .
SFX	VD	նել	ցրած/CHABGEINLODEPP .
SFX	VD	նել	ցրածներ/CHABGEINLODE .
SFX	VD	նել	ել .	
SFX	VD	չել	ել .
SFX	VD	նել	ցուել/CHG2A2INLODE .	
SFX	VD	չել	ցուել/CHG2A2INLODE .
SFX	VD	նել	ցրել .	
SFX	VD	չել	ցրել .
SFX	VD	նել	իր .	
SFX	VD	չել	իր .
SFX	VD	նել	էք .	
SFX	VD	չել	էք .
SFX	VD	ել	ուել/CHG2A2INLODE	.
SFX	VD	ել	ուեմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	ել	ուես/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	ել	ուի/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	ել	ուենք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	ել	ուէք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	ել	ուեն/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնող/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VD	նել	ցնողներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VD	նել	ցրած/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VD	նել	ցրածներ/CHDEABGEINLO .	
SFX	VD	նել	ցուել/CHG2A2INLODE .	
SFX	VD	նել	ցուիր .	
SFX	VD	նել	ցուեցէք .
SFX	VD	նել	ցրէք .
SFX	VD	նել	ցրու .
SFX	VD	նել	ցրեցէք .
SFX	VD	նել	ցնել/CHG2A2INLODE	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցներ	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնեմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնես/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնի/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնենք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնէք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնեն/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնէի/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնէիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնէր/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնէինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնէիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնէին/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցրեցի/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցրեցիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցրեց/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցրեցինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցրեցիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցրեցին/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցրի/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցրիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցրինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցրիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցրին/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնելիս	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուելիս	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցւում	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցնում	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուեր .
SFX	VD	նել	ցուել/CHG2A2INLODE	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուեմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուես/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուի/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուենք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուէք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուեն/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուէի/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուէիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուէր/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուէինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուէիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուէին/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուեցի/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուեցիր/CH	.
SFX	VD	նել	ցուեց/CH .
SFX	VD	նել	ցուեցինք/CH .
SFX	VD	նել	ցուեցիք/CH .
SFX	VD	նել	ցուեցին/CH .
SFX	VD	չել	ցնող/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VD	չել	ցնողներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VD	չել	ցրած/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VD	չել	ցրածներ/CHDEABGEINLO .	
SFX	VD	չել	ցուել/CHG2A2INLODE .	
SFX	VD	չել	ցուիր .	
SFX	VD	չել	ցուեցէք .
SFX	VD	չել	ցրէք .
SFX	VD	չել	ցրու .
SFX	VD	չել	ցրեցէք .
SFX	VD	չել	ցնել/CHG2A2INLODE	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցներ	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցնեմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցնես/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցնի/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցնենք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցնէք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցնեն/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցնէի/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցնէիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցնէր/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցնէինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցնէիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցնէին/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցրեցի/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցրեցիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցրեց/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցրեցինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցրեցիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցրեցին/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցրի/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցրիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցրինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցրիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցրին/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցնելիս	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցուելիս	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցւում	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցնում	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցուեր .
SFX	VD	չել	ցուել/CHG2A2INLODE	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցուեմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցուես/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցուի/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցուենք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցուէք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցուեն/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցուէի/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցուէիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցուէր/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցուէինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցուէիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցուէին/CHGU	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցուեցի/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցուեցիր/CH	.
SFX	VD	չել	ցուեց/CH .
SFX	VD	չել	ցուեցինք/CH .
SFX	VD	չել	ցուեցիք/CH .
SFX	VD	չել	ցուեցին/CH .



#tsnel վերցնել
SFX	VE	Y	54
SFX	VE	նել	րի/CH	.
SFX	VE	նել	րիր/CH	.
SFX	VE	նել	րեց/CH .
SFX	VE	նել	րինք/CH .
SFX	VE	նել	րիք/CH .
SFX	VE	նել	րին/CH .
SFX	VE	նել	րեցի/CH	.
SFX	VE	նել	րեցիր/CH	.
SFX	VE	նել	րեցինք/CH .
SFX	VE	նել	րեցիք/CH .
SFX	VE	նել	րեցին/CH .
SFX	VE	նել	ուել/CH	.
SFX	VE	նել	ուեմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VE	նել	ուես/CHGU	.
SFX	VE	նել	ուի/CHGU	.
SFX	VE	նել	ուենք/CHGU	.
SFX	VE	նել	ուէք/CHGU	.
SFX	VE	նել	ուեն/CHGU	.
SFX	VE	նել	ուել/CHG2A2INLODE	.
SFX	VE	նել	ուէի/CHGU	.
SFX	VE	նել	ուէիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VE	նել	ուէր/CHGU	.
SFX	VE	նել	ուէինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VE	նել	ուէիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VE	նել	ուէին/CHGU	.
SFX	VE	նել	ուէի/CHGU	.
SFX	VE	նել	ուէիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VE	նել	ուէր/CHGU	.
SFX	VE	նել	ուէինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VE	նել	ուէիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VE	նել	ուէին/CHGU	.
SFX	VE	նել	ուեցի/CHGU	.
SFX	VE	նել	ուեցիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VE	նել	ուեց/CHGU	.
SFX	VE	նել	ուեցինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VE	նել	ուեցիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VE	նել	ուեցին/CHGU	.
SFX	VE	ել	ող/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VE	ել	ողներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VE	նել	րած/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VE	նել	րածներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VE	նել	ուող/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VE	նել	ուողներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VE	նել	ուած/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VE	նել	ուածներ/CHDEABGEINLO .	
SFX	VE	նել	րել .
SFX	VE	նել	րու .	
SFX	VE	ել	իր .	
SFX	VE	նել	րէք .	
SFX	VE	նել	ուիր .	
SFX	VE	նել	ուեցէք .
SFX	VE	նել	ուելիս	.
SFX	VE	նել	ւում	.
SFX	VE	նել	ուեր .


	
REP 35
REP	ե	է
REP 	է	ե
REP	կ	կ'
REP	կ	կը_
REP	կ'	կը_
REP	ո	օ
REP	օ	ո
REP	հ	յ
REP	յ	հ
REP	եք	էք
REP	յու	իւ
REP	ույ	ոյ
REP	եի	էի
REP	յո	եօ
REP	յա	եա
REP	վ	ու
REP	վ	ւ
REP	ա	այ
REP	ո	ոյ
REP	ր	ռ
REP	ռ	ր
REP	եու	էու
REP	եա	էա
REP	եր ներ
REP	ներ եր
REP	նդեր	ունդներ
REP	մբեր ումբներ
REP	նդներ ունդներ
REP	հրդեր հուրդներ
REP	նկեր ունկեր
REP	բերէ բեր
REP	ռեր իռներ
REP	իծներ ծեր
REP	վտեր վիտներ
REP	պտեր պիտներ
